Utah statutes.
49-16-601.   Disability benefit -- Line-of-duty disability -- Benefits -- Monthly allowance.

(1)  An active member of this system who is unable to perform firefighter service due to a physical or mental condition that was not incurred in the line-of-duty may apply to the office for a disability retirement benefit subject to the following provisions:

(a)  if the member has less than five years of service credit in this system, disability benefits are not payable; and

(b)  if the condition is classified by the office as a nonline-of-duty disability and if the member has five or more years of service credit in this system, the member shall be granted a disability retirement benefit subject to Section 49-16-602.

(2)  The monthly disability retirement benefit is 50% of the member's final average monthly salary.

